District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.31

Voting of shares — Quorum of shareholders required.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 191, ch. 269, § 31
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 86-106, § 7
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.31.
1981 Ed., § 29-331.
1973 Ed., § 29-915.